Utah statutes.
7-1-211.   Reports of commissioner to governor and Legislature.

The commissioner shall submit on or before October 1 of each year a report to the governor and to the Legislature containing information from the last report of condition furnished by each institution under the supervision of the department and any other proceeding had or done by the department showing generally the condition of the businesses under the supervision of the department and such other matters in connection with the businesses as may be of interest to the public; and a detailed statement, verified by oath, of all fees and other money received by the department during the same period.



Enacted by Chapter 16, 1981 General Session

